Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Chapter 35. Business Names.

Sec. 10.35.010.
Reservation of name.

The exclusive right to the use of a business name may be reserved by a person intending to start a business or a person intending to change the name of the person’s business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966)

Sec. 10.35.020.
Application to reserve name; availability of name.

Reservation of a business name is made by filing an application with the commissioner. Upon finding that the name is available for business use, the commissioner shall reserve it for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of 120 days. A name is not available for business use if the name is not distinguishable on the records of the department under AS

10.35.040(a)

or gives the impression that the business is incorporated.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966; am § 53 ch 170 SLA 1976; am §§ 17, 18 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendments to this section made by §§ 17 and 18, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.35.030.
Transfer of reserved name.

The holder of a reserved name may transfer the right to the exclusive use of the name to another person by filing with the commissioner a notice of transfer that is signed by the holder and specifies the name and address of the transferee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966)

Sec. 10.35.040.
Registration of name.

A person conducting a business may register its name if the name is distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. In this subsection,

“organized entity” means

a corporation under AS 10.06;

a foreign corporation authorized under AS 10.06 to transact business in this state;

a BIDCO licensed under AS 10.13;

a cooperative organized under AS 10.15;

a foreign cooperative under AS 10.15 that is authorized under AS 10.06 to do business in this state;

a nonprofit corporation organized under AS 10.20;

a nonprofit foreign corporation authorized under AS 10.20 to transact business in this state;

a cooperative organized under AS 10.25;

a religious corporation formed under AS 10.40;

a professional corporation organized under AS 10.45;

a limited liability company organized under AS 10.50;

a foreign limited liability company registered under AS 10.50;

a registered limited liability partnership under AS 32.06;

a foreign limited liability partnership registered under AS 32.06;

a limited partnership formed under AS 32.11; or

a foreign limited partnership registered under AS 32.11;

“reserved or registered name” means a name reserved or registered under this chapter, AS 10.06, AS 10.50, AS 32.06, or AS 32.11.

Registration of a name gives the person who has registered the name the exclusive right to the use of the name. A person who has registered a name under this chapter

may enjoin the use by another person of a name that is not distinguishable on the records of the department from the registered name;

has a cause of action for damages against another person who uses a name that is not distinguishable on the records of the department from the registered name.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966; am § 54 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 50 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 19, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Because a corporation is a “person” as that term is used in this chapter, and because a corporation is not prohibited by law from doing business under an assumed name, it should not be prevented from registering an assumed name under this chapter. February 14, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 10.35.050.
Procedure for registration of name.

Registration of a business name is made by filing with the commissioner an application for registration.
The application must be executed by an owner of the business and must contain the owner’s name and address, the name and addresses of the business, the name and address of each person having an interest in the business, a statement that the owner is doing business, and a brief statement of the nature of the business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966)

Sec. 10.35.060.
Fee for and duration of registered name.

The fee for the initial registration of a business name shall be established by the department by regulation. The year in which the registration becomes effective is considered a full year of registration and the registration is effective until the close of the fifth calendar year beginning with the year of initial registration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966; am § 55 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 70 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 24 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.35.070.
Renewal of registered name.

A registered business name may be renewed every five years if an application for renewal is filed. An application for renewal must set out the facts required in an original application for registration and be accompanied by a renewal fee to be established by the department by regulation. An application for renewal may be filed between October 1 and December 31 of any year. The renewal of the registration extends the registration for the following five calendar years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966; am § 56 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 71 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 25 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.35.075.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 10.35.080.
Business names not registered.

This chapter does not abrogate any rights between persons who have not registered a business name under those sections.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966)

Sec. 10.35.085.
Cancellation of filings.

The provisions in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) relating to the cancellation of certain corporate filings apply to business names.

History.

(§ 72 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to cancellation of certificates and filings, see AS

10.06.865

.

Sec. 10.35.500.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“business” means any commercial or industrial enterprise which is not incorporated and which may be owned by a person or persons, partnership, firm, association, or organization;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1966; am § 73 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 20 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 10.35.090.
Renumbered in 1985.
Also reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the terms defined.

In 1999, in paragraph (3), “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” in order to reconcile chs. 50 and 58, SLA 1999.

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.